Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.215, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. A grant under the program may be awarded to any minority person who is a resident of Iowa, who is accepted for admission or is attending a board of regentsâ university, community college, or an accredited private institution, and who demonstrates financial need. Applicants who receive vouchers under section 262.92 shall be given priority in receiving House File 2539, p. 2 grants under the program, but an applicant shall not be denied a grant because the applicant does not hold vouchers under the program in section 262.92 . For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 1990, and in subsequent years, grants Grants shall be awarded to all minority persons, with priority to be given to those minority persons who are residents of Iowa. Sec. 2. Section 256.216, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 3. Section 262.9, subsections 5, 6, 7, 20, and 21, Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. Sec. 4. Section 262.9, subsection 31, paragraph h, Code 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 5. Section 262.93, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 262.93 Reports to general assembly. The college student aid commission and the state board of regents each shall submit to the general assembly, by January 15 of each year, a report on the progress and implementation of the programs which they administer program administered under sections 256.214 through 256.217 and 262.92 . By January 31 of each year, the state board of regents shall submit a report to the general assembly regarding the progress and implementation of the program administered pursuant to section 262.82 . The reports shall report must include but are is not limited to the numbers of students and educators participating in the programs program and allocation of funds appropriated for the programs program . Sec. 6. Section 282.18, subsection 15, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 7. REPEAL. 2014 Iowa Acts, chapter 1125, section 10, is repealed. Sec. 8. REPEAL. Sections 256.181, 256.213, 262.9C, 262.20, 262.81, 262.82, 262.91, 262.92, and 266.47, Code 2026, are repealed. Sec. 9. REPEAL. Chapter 265, Code 2026, is repealed. Sec. 10. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. 1. The Code editor is directed to make the following transfer: Section 262.93 to section 256.217A. House File 2539, p. 3 2. The Code editor shall correct internal references in the Code and in any enacted legislation as necessary due to the enactment of this section. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2539, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor